 We now have four months old diabetic mice, but they've never had diabetes.
 Dr Ehud Shapiro, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Canada,
 And like other experts, he's sceptical about the chances of a cure.
 On Monday, the Swedish Academy's permanent Secretary, Sara Danius, announced on a Swedish radio show that the Academy had been unable to contact Bob Dylan,
 Danius said, we're keeping a low profile. I've spoken to the best of his contacts,
 Earlier, Ring's Ceo, Jamie Siminoff, had said that when the company was first starting out, he couldn't hear the doorbell ring.
 He says he's made a WiFi doorbell.
 In 2013, Westinov said, sales of the company soared after he appeared on the show, and the producers of the show refused to invest in the startup.
 At the end of 2017, Siminov appeared on the Qvc television sales channel.
 The ring company also reached a settlement with its rival, ADT security.
 Although there is one experimental vaccine that seems to reduce the death rate from Ebola,
 A drug called ZMapp, a cocktail of multiple antibodies, had initially been touted as having promise in the field, but formal studies have shown that it is not as effective in preventing death.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp was used as a reference, or baseline, to which the other three treatments were compared.
 The USA Gymnastics letter to the U S . Olympic Committee expressed support and accepted the strict requirements of the Olympic family,
 We agree with the statement of the U S . Olympic Committee,
 According to an independent survey supported by USA gymnastics, we may be able to find out why Larry Nassar's alleged widespread sexual abuse went undetected for so long.
 The U S . gymnastics Association and the U S . Olympic Committee have a common goal, which is to ensure the safety of gymnastics and other sports,
 In the sixty s, Brzezinski worked first for John F . Kennedy and then for Lyndon B . Johnson.
 In 1976, he advised Carter on foreign policy during the Presidential campaign, and then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981.
 As a national security advisor, he had helped Carter deal with a number of international crises, such as the signing of the SALT II treaty in 1979, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This movie, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated for all the major awards.
 Goslin and Stein both received nominations for best actor and actress.
 Other nominations include best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best film editing, best original score, best art direction, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Chasing Cars" and "A Thousand Suns", were nominated for Best Original Song.
 And it was at this time that the transfer of the title of Fashion Capital from Constantinople to Paris was made.
 Trump made a statement after his call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey has also taken over the custody of the Islamic state fighters who were arrested.
 This not only confirmed the theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers,
 Scientists have said that the top of the feathers were a reddish-brown, and the bottom a lighter shade of brown or a pale green.
 This discovery also helped to deepen our understanding of bird feathers.
 The dinosaurs' feathers did not develop a main stem, called a feather shaft, but still had other feathered features, such as the feather's vane and barbs.
 The structure of the feathers indicate that they were not used for flight, but rather to regulate temperature or to display.
 Researchers believe that although this is a juvenile dinosaur's tail, the sample shows adult feathers, not juvenile dinosaur down.
 Yesterday morning, a car bombing incident took place in Gaziantep, Turkey, which killed two police officers and injured over twenty people.
 The governor's office said nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 The police say they suspect an Islamic state gunman.
 They found that the sun and other stars worked in the same way, that the activity of all the stars in a given Galaxy depended entirely on their luminosity and on their rate of rotation.
 The Rossby number of a star is determined by its luminosity and its rotation, and is related to the Corona of the Star.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active a star is in reversing its magnetic field.
 On the way, Yoshikawa encountered a lot of trouble.
 He had been robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, and had been arrested in Nepal for attempted suicide.
 The 802.11n standard can run at 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz frequencies.
 It can backward-compatibly support 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radios.
 The speed of 802.11n is much faster than the previous technology, with a maximum theoretical throughput of up to 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who is married with two grown children, did not make much of an impression on Miller.
 When asked to comment, Miller said, quote,
 By 2020, we will strive to bring about a significant reduction in the unit of our country's carbon dioxide emissions.
 He did not set a reduction target, but only indicated that it would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu Jintao encouraged developing countries to not retrace the old path of pollution first, then cleanup.
 He added, however, that they should not be required to bear obligations beyond their developmental stage, responsibilities and capabilities.
 The Iraq study group submitted its report at twelve zero GMT.
 The report warned that no one can guarantee that any action being taken in Iraq will stop sectarian war, growing violence or a slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for a public debate and consensus on U S . policy in the Middle East.
 The report made several harsh criticisms of the administration's current Iraq policy, and urged an immediate change of direction.
 In the report, the first of 78 recommendations was to take new diplomatic action by the end of the year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile forces and to rebuild diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 The current Senator, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 In Argentina, Kirchner announced her intention to run for President in the Argentine National Congress in Buenos Aires.
 This debate began in the aftermath of Hurricane Katrina,
 Criticism of the rebuilding process focused mainly on the awarding of rebuilding contracts to what were seen as Washington insiders.
 There were over four hundred thousand people who went to Rome to attend the funeral.
 There were so many people at the funeral in St . Peter's square that it was impossible for everyone to get in.
 In the city of Rome, several large television screens were set up for people to watch the event.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as in other parts of the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were set up to accommodate large crowds.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on cases that are easy to solve, such as car thefts,
 Congress began funding the program in fiscal year 2005, and required the Federal Bureau of Investigation to designate ten agents to combat child pornography.
 Robin Uthappa took the highest score of the innings, with 41 runs from just 41 balls.
 The doubles pairing of Sajin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well, winning the 100-run partnership.
 But after the team leader lost three columns, India scored only 36 points in the end, losing 7 columns.
 The U S . President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteen,
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Hsien Loong, and discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush addressed the nation on the state of Asian trade expansion.
 On Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper, in his office, met with NDP leader Jack Layton for a 25-minute meeting,
 Layton met with the Prime Minister and demanded that the Conservative government's environmental legislation be completely rewritten.
 Since the Commonwealth Government's takeover of the Devonport Mersey hospital in Tasmania,
 But Australian Prime Minister John Howard said the bill was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading hospital facilities.
 The latest public report shows sea level readings that indicate a tsunami has occurred.
 Tonga reported no major damage or casualties, but reported that power was temporarily disrupted.
 Although the warning was canceled, fourteen schools located on or near the Hawaiian coastline closed for the entirety of Thursday.
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, supported the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for the Bush administration, called the North Korean pledge an important step forward.
 Tropical storm Jerry formed today in the Atlantic, making it the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season.
 The National Hurricane Center said at the time that it was not a threat to land.
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain would be enough to overwhelm the dam.
 The Eighth-Grade water level at the time of the hurricane was twenty feet,
 At one point, the river was about to overflow its banks.
 Shared-Resource administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion of the article in an interview with Wikinews last month.
 And he said, quote, from the beginning, he has lied to us.
 Because of public outcry, a draft policy is currently being drafted to address the sexually explicit content on the site, which has millions of publicly licensed media.
 The work that was done was mostly theoretical, but the purpose of the programming was to simulate the observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The team is now looking for the effect that might be caused by the tides between dark matter and the dark matter in the Milky way.
 Just as the moon's gravity pulls on the tides of the earth,
 Scientists can conclude that dark matter acts in the same way as ordinary matter.
 The theory suggests that most of the dark matter around a given Galaxy is in the form of a halo,
 The television news reported that there was white smoke coming out of the factory.
 The local government warned residents near the nuclear power plant to stay indoors, turn off their air conditioning, and not to drink tap water.
 The Japanese nuclear agency said that it had detected radioactive caesium and iodine.
 The authorities have estimated that it could take up to 10 years to clean up the site.
 Dr Tony Morrell discovered this widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis in KwaZulu-Natal province, South Africa.
 He said in a press conference, quote,
 Dr . Moll believes some of the patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of the patients were hospital staff.
 One person within a year may infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis seems to be a much smaller proportion of the total TB population.
 These two satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds, were traveling at 17,500 miles per hour when they collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 Scientists say the explosion was huge.
 They're still working to determine the size of the impact and its effect on the earth.
 The Pentagon's Strategic Command is tracking the wreckage.
 The results of the mapping analysis will be published on the public network.
 The Ohio authorities say that a doctor found his mother's body in the trunk of a car on Wednesday, and that the doctor, who works at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will face a charge of aggravated murder.
 The 29-year-old Malar Balasubramanian was found in the suburb of Brunswick, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati,
 She directed the officers to go to her black Ozma, a kind of passionate automobile, which stood at a distance of five hundred yards.
 There, they found the body of 53-year-old Saroj Bahadur Bhusal, covered in bloodstained sheets.
 The police say the body had been there for about a day.
 By the end of July, the first cases of the season were reported.
 The virus then spreads to humans via mosquitoes.
 This outbreak has prompted the Indian government to take some measures, like placing cage traps in heavily infected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying insecticide.
 The government also promised to provide hundreds of millions of doses of the meningitis vaccine, which will help health care providers to be ready for next year.
 Due to a lack of funding and a lower priority than other diseases, the plan to provide vaccines to the worst-hit areas this year has been delayed.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where he began working at the Swedish post office as a chief stamp designer.
 He has created over 1000 stamps for Sweden and other 28 countries.
 His work is highly recognizable, with a high quality and rich detail, which also makes him one of the very few in the stamp collecting world to be a household name.
 The 1000th stamp he created in 2000 was based on David's great achievement of the Swedish King,
 He has also participated in the design of many national currencies, including the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 Gibson was rushed to the hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was uninjured in the crash.
 At around twelve o'clock, the car was towed away from the scene of the accident.
 One worker standing in a nearby car park said, the kids were just waiting to cross the road and they were all screaming and crying.
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 Other items on the agenda for the Bali conference included saving the world's forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The United Nations also hopes to eventually set up a fund to help countries deal with the impact of global warming.
 This money could be used to build flood-resistant houses, improve water management and promote crop diversification.
 Falk wrote that some people try to suppress women's voices on women's health issues, but heaven does not will it.
 The point is that she had a lot of positive and encouraging individual comments from men and women,
 The injured were sent to the hospital, and the fight ended, leaving about forty inmates in the yard, refusing to go back to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to turn the tide, but the inmate's demands were unclear.
 In the mountains, it was late at night, around ten to eleven.
 Soon, riot police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to force the inmates to surrender.
 Firefighters finally put out the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 The dam was completed in 1963, and the seasonal flooding was controlled,
 This sediment is a necessary condition for the formation of sandbars and beaches, which are the habitat of wildlife.
 As a result, two species became extinct, and two others were on the brink of extinction, including the Bowfin.
 Although the water level only rose a few inches after the flood, officials hoped this would be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There are no tsunami warnings at this time.
 Although there is no tsunami threat, locals are feeling uneasy and are leaving their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey wept as she said goodbye, she made it clear to her fans that she would be back.
 This is not a farewell.
 The final outcome of the Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections indicated that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was re-elected by a huge margin.
 The ruling SWAPO party also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 The allies and Afghan forces entered the area to protect the position, and other allied aircraft were sent to support them.
 The plane crashed in a high mountainous area, and it was alleged that the enemy's fire had caused it.
 The search for the crash site encountered bad weather and terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organisation have said this is the worst outbreak the country has ever seen.
 The head of Doctors Without Borders in Angola, Richard Veerman, says,
 The weather was perfect for a game of seven-a-side Rugby.
 The number one seed South Africa started off well, beating the number five seed Zambia 26-00.
 In the match against the Southern team, South Africa looked a bit sloppy at the beginning, but as the match went on, they steadily improved.
 They are known for their strict defense, ball control and superb teamwork.
 The Amsterdam city government and officials at the Anne Frank Museum said the tree had been infected with a fungus and posed a threat to public health.
 According to the original plan, it was to be cut down on Tuesday, but it was spared after an emergency court ruling.
 All of the entrances to these caves, which are called the seven sisters, are at least 100 to 250 meters wide.
 Infrared images show the day-to-day temperature changes, indicating that these are likely caves.
 They're cooler during the day and warmer at night.
 And the bottom of the hole is a stable, constant temperature,
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: voters go into a small booth, put a pre-printed, pre-stamped envelope into a slot,
 The official then verified the voter's identity and the voter placed the envelope in the ballot box and signed the ballot register.
 The French electoral code sets out a very strict set of rules for the election process.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has had to be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no envelopes are put into the box before the start of the vote, and that no other person than those entitled to vote puts an envelope into the box.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe every step of the election process.
 The Eee PC was released earlier than the global launch, and became a hot topic in the IT news of Taipei in 2007.
 But after Asus won the 2007 Taiwanese government's permanent development award,
 According to the station's Website, the show is a “Brand-New, Mind-Blowing, Geeky-Style old-fashioned radio drama.
 In the early years, the show was only broadcast on TogiNet Radio, a long-running Internet radio station.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet broadcasting as a sub-station.
 The show initially featured amateur voice actors, ranging from local people to East Germans in East Texas.
 The report stated that the police were not present, and that the robbery had gone on all night.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a state of anarchy, with groups of people roaming the streets and looting shops.
 Several Besh-Ke-Rok residents blamed the illegal state of affairs on protesters from the South.
 In the Rugby League three nations tournament in Rustenburg, South Africa, the South African team defeated the all-black New Zealand team.
 The final outcome was a one-point victory, ending the all-black team's 15-game winning streak.
 The jumping deer team ended up with five straight losses.
 The all-black team had won the cup two weeks earlier, and this was their last game.
 The final game of the series will be played next week in Johannesburg's Ellis Park Stadium, where the Springboks will face off against the Wallabies.
 And the central part of Montana,
 The us Geological survey and the us National earthquake information center have not yet received any reports of damage from the earthquake.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon and 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 On Monday, a dead wild duck was found in a swamp near Lyon, in the east of France, and it was confirmed to have been infected with the H5N1 strain of the deadly bird flu virus.
 After Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, France is the seventh EU country to be hit hard by the virus.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 Cohen, a notorious know-nothing, believed his suit was a matter of chance,
 Camille Saint-Saens created a French opera that tells the story of an artist who was addicted to drugs and obsessed with Japan.
 As a result, the actors on stage were smoking marijuana, and the theater itself encouraged the audience to join in.
 The former House Speaker, Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas, Rick Perry, and the female Congresswoman, Michelle Bachmann,
 And after the results came in, Goldrich praised Santorum, but issued a harsh rebuke to Romney.
 Perry stated that he would return to Texas to assess the outcome of the caucus and would then decide whether to continue his campaign.
 In August, the former Prime Minister, Ehud Barak, decided to withdraw from the race.
 The photographer was sent to the Ronald Reagan Usc medical center in Los Angeles, where he died.
 He was reported to be in his early 20s, and released a statement saying, quote,
 The photographer stopped his car on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard,
 The driver of the car that hit the photographer may not face criminal charges.
 Since there were only eighteen medals awarded per day, many of the competitors did not get to stand on the podium.
 Athletes who did not win a medal include Dutch gymnast Anouk van der Weijden, who finished ninth in the women's vault, and Finnish gymnast Katriina Ihalainen, who finished tenth in the women's vault.
 The Australian Michelle Gillespie won the women's superpipe.
 In the men's super giant slalom, Mexican rider Larrazabal got the 15th place, and New Zealand rider Adam Holler got the 9th place.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska won the thirteenth place in the super-G,
 United Nations peacekeepers arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, and they were blamed for the spread of the disease.
 The lawsuit alleges that the United Nations camp failed to adequately dispose of its waste, leading to bacteria entering the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest.
 Haiti had not encountered the disease since the early nineteenth century.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study which showed that Nepalese UN peacekeepers had brought the disease to Haiti without knowing.
 The United Nations specialist on the disease, Danielle Lantagne, says the outbreak is likely to have been caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University hospital's patients were stable.
 This patient had been to Nigeria, where there had been several cases of the Ebola virus.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating the patient from other people to prevent the infection from spreading.
 Before appearing in the Simpsons, Simmons had worked in several other shows.
 In the eighty s, he worked on the show rent a car, the late show, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he created the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and hired the show's first writing team.
 He left the show in 1993, but retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties.
 Earlier, the state news agency, Xinhua, reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 The report said the plane had been threatened by a bomb and was forced to return to Kandahar.
 Earlier reports said the plane had been denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumqi and had returned to Afghanistan.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where civilian and military planes are old and poorly maintained.
 In the absence of new planes, Iran could not buy new planes.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an Iranian passenger plane crashed, killing all 168 people on board, the worst air disaster in Iran for many years.
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed off the runway at Mashhad, killing 17 people.
 Airplane mechanics have canceled the rest of their tour.
 This tour was scheduled to continue in the United States and Canada until September 16.
 The lead singer, Stephen Tyler, fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, and the band canceled the rest of the tour.
 Each side held serve in the opening game of the fifth set,
 Del Potro started the second set strongly, but when the score reached 6-6, a tie-break was needed to decide the set.
 At this point, Portillo accepted the shoulder treatment, but still insisted on continuing the race.
 The show aired at 8:30 p m. local time.
 All over India, famous singers sang prayers to Shri Shyam.
 The evening was opened by Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also sang the chhappan bhog prayer.
 And then Lakshman Singh led the way in singing a bhajan.
 108 plates of food were offered to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also introduced the chhappan bhog bhajan,
 On Thursday, at the Tokyo game show, Nintendo's president, Shuntaro Furukawa, unveiled the company's newest Nintendo Revolution game controller design.
 The Controller is similar to a television remote control, using two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 It allows players to control the movement and operation of electronic games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and retired shortly after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso led most of the race, but retired after a pit stop due to a right-rear tire puncture.
 Michael Schumacher retired shortly after his accident at the Spanish Grand Prix.
 According to the news conference transcript, he had said, quote, she's cute and she sings well.
 Every time we rehearse this performance, I'm always deeply moved.
 About three minutes later, the camera on the rocket showed a large amount of insulating foam debris falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, these bubbles were deemed to have caused no damage to the space shuttle.
 Nasa's space shuttle project manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam was only dropped after it had withstood the length of time that NASA had feared.
 The wind started about five minutes into the show, and within a minute, it was raining at a rate of 70 kilometers per hour.
 My sister and her friend disappeared, and two disabled people were sitting on their wheelchairs,
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power station in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 The Tohoku Electric Power Company reported that the Fukushima I and II reactors had been shut down,
 According to reports, about 9,400 households in the area have been without water, and about 100 households have been without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and rail service in the affected areas was disrupted, with Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport still closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Two hours later, three more bombs went off in the vicinity of government buildings.
 Some reports say the official death toll was eight, but according to official reports, there were as many as 30 people injured.
 In the urine samples of pets that had died after eating tainted pet food,
 Researchers at the University of California, Davis, say the two compounds interact to form crystals that may cause kidney damage.
 Researchers observed that when the cats were given urea and uric acid,
 Through infrared spectroscopy,
 I do not know if you have noticed, but most of the imports from Central America are duty-free.
 Yet eighty percent of our goods are taxed in Central American countries.
 I think this is quite unfair and I think it is quite unreasonable.
 I said to the people, look, we're going to treat you the way you treat us.
 California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that banned the sale or rental of violent electronic games to minors.
 The law required that violent electronic games sold in California must be labelled with a 18, and the retailer would be fined 1,000 dollars for each violation.
 The Attorney General, Kier Starmer, announced today that he is prosecuting Hoon and Pryce.
 The resignation of Hunnam, who was also a member of the cabinet, is expected to be replaced by Norman Lamb, the current Minister of state for business.
 Hunn and Pryce will appear in Westminster magistrates court on February 16.
 The two men were Nicholas Alden, age twenty five, and Zachary Cuddeback, age twenty one.
 Edgar Veguilla's arm and neck were injured, while Kristoffer Schneider needed a facial reconstruction.
 Uka's weapon failed when it was aimed at the fifth person's head, and Schneider suffered a loss of vision in one eye, a missing piece of skull, and a reconstruction of his face using titanium plates.
 Schneider testified via a video link from his home in the United States.
 In addition to the inter-district competition, Carpanedo also participated in two individual events.
 Her first event was the ski jumping, and in the first round she finished in last place with a score of zero.
 The other event she competed in was the all-around, where she placed tenth with a total score of 4:41.30,
 Four of the women's Giant Slalom skiers did not finish the race, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom did not make the cut.
 The central police recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Commissioner Arya said, we have arrested five people who raped this Swiss woman, and we have found her phone and her laptop.
 The defendants' names were Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandrakant Solanki, said the accused were all masked when they appeared in court.
 Although the car hit the house, there were three people inside, but no one was injured.
 However, the driver's head was severely injured.
 The road was temporarily closed, and emergency personnel rescued the driver from the burning red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adcock was then charged with the murder of her son and appeared before Edinburgh sheriff court.
 She was detained, awaiting trial and sentencing, but any witness's testimony could be tainted because of the widespread publicity.
 In Scotland, the court said, publishing the photographs could cause potential harm.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee said,
 The main Department of the Royal Commission, the Royal prosecution service, told reporters it would not be making any further comments until the case was at least in the public domain.
 According to the report, the document will mention the border dispute, and Palestine hopes to base it on the 1967 borders.
 Other topics reportedly discussed included the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both, and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demanded that the Palestinian National Authority only keep troops in the West Bank for five years.
 Forest rangers closely monitored the participants in the supplemental pesticide trial, because the trial was being monitored and evaluated.
 In partnership with the National Parks and Wildlife Service and the New South Wales shooting Association, the shooting Association recruited qualified volunteers for the hunting program.
 The New South Wales National Parks and Wildlife Service director Mick O'Flynn said:
 Yesterday, Marthaler was sworn in as a member of the new interim electoral Council.
 This is the fifth time that Martelly has been selected by the CEP.
 The Presidential Commission recommended the former Ceps to resign last month as part of a push to move the country towards new electoral measures.
 This Commission was Martelly's response to the large-scale anti-government protests that began in October.
 Since 2011, these protests have been triggered by a number of elections that have not gone ahead as scheduled, and sometimes have escalated into violent incidents.
 There were about 60 reported iPod failures, with the iPods overheating and causing 6 fires, resulting in 4 minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry in Japan has said it has been notified of 27 incidents involving the device.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry announced that Apple had reported 34 more cases of overheating, although the company said they were not serious.
 The economic and industry Department responded that the delay in the report was a great disappointment.
 The Mariana Islands experienced an earthquake at 7:19 a M. local time,
 The North Mariana emergency management office says there have been no reported damage to the island.
 And the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said it had seen no tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tourist bus in the capital, Manila, and took the Hong Kong tourists as hostages.
 Rolando Mendoza raised his M16 rifle and started shooting at the tourists.
 Many hostages were rescued, and at least six hostages were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early.
 The two photographers then replaced the old lady who had to go to the toilet, and Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career as a doctor.
 He had been trained as a gynaecologist and worked at the National women's hospital in Auckland from 1959.
 Liggins worked in a hospital, and began studying premature birth in his spare time.
 His research has shown that applying hormones can accelerate the maturation of the baby's lungs.
 The Associated Press reported that the government's investigators found two black boxes on Thursday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy dreamed of a first lady and a first manager,
 Dustin Runnels, aka Goldust, commented, quote,
 A poll taken before the 2010 Federal election found that 8% of Australians wanted Australia to become a Republic.
 The debate was sparked by controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction in the wake of Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives have humorously labeled Bush's New Orleans Deal.
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed said they would like to see Queen Elizabeth II as the last British monarch.
 There is a polarised split in the way Australians view the Republic.
 This Olympic gold medallist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200 metre freestyle and the Commonwealth games three-event relay, but because of his complaints, his health has been questioned.
 He had been unable to use medication to ease his pain, because the competition forbade participants from using such drugs.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number on January 25.
 In early February, a few people validated the discovery using different hardware and software, and announced it on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been the source of water and organic matter on earth, which could have formed proteins and sustained life.
 Scientists hope to learn how planets, and especially the earth, formed long ago.
 A 53-year-old Cuomo has been governor since the beginning of this year, and he signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors political nonsense and stupid behavior.
 He is expected to run for President in 2016.
 The Federal Aviation Administration says NextGen could reduce the length of flights by millions of gallons of fuel each year, and reduce carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite technology, rather than the old-fashioned ground-based radar, which allows air traffic controllers to locate planes more precisely and to give pilots more accurate information.
 There are no additional transportation, and the surface train does not stop at Wembley, nor does it have a parking lot or parking exchange.
 Because of the fear of lacking transportation, the competition might be forced to be held behind closed doors without the presence of any of the team's supporters.
 On Thursday, a study published in the Journal Science reported the discovery of a new bird in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from the University of Princeton in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden report that, due to the mating of a local Darwin's finch and an introduced cactus wren,
 Gold can be worked into various shapes. It can be rolled into a small shape.
 It can be drawn into a fine thread, which is used for binding and weaving, or it can be beaten into a paste,
 It can be made very thin, sticking to other metals, and because of its thinness, it can sometimes be used to decorate the hand-painted pictures in what are called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. You can use red cabbage juice to make a pH indicator.
 The color of the spinach juice will change depending on the acidity of the chemical.
 The pH value is a measure of the number of hydrogen ions in a chemical.
 The hydrogen atom is the simplest atom, consisting of a single proton and a single electron.
 Mix two kinds of powder to make a paste, and then use a clean, wet hand to mash them into a ball.
 The water on your skin will react with the outer layer, creating a kind of shell that feels really cool.
 Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had almost every house with a flushing toilet, which was connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 In the Greek Islands of Crete and Santorini, houses have been found with sewage systems.
 In ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were also toilets,
 You'd use a satellite to call someone who's thousands of miles away.
 The satellite in space received the call, and almost immediately reflected it back.
 A satellite is launched into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and vision.
 In order to get a satellite or telescope into space, a giant rocket is needed, one that is over one hundred feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in ways that are hard to imagine.
 Without it, we would have no railroads, no automobiles, and no other means of transportation.
 Below them are more of the medium-sized cats, eating medium-sized prey, from rabbits to deer.
 In the end, there are many small cat species, including domestic cats,
 The key to their success is the Legitimacy concept, where each cat is responsible for a particular task, and prevents them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of the big cats, living in groups called prides.
 A pride consists of one to three adult males, and up to thirty related females and cubs.
 As sisters and daughters, females are usually close to each other.
 The behavior of the lion pride is very similar to that of a wolf or dog pack,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete, it can climb, swim, jump, and pull with a strength that is five times that of the world's strongest human.
 Tiger, lion, and the American cougar are all in the same family, the big cats.
 The tiger's roar is not as deep and menacing as the lion's roar, but more like a man's angry bark.
 Tigers like to eat small animals, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists believe that the jaguar uses its sense of smell and its ability to sniff out the scent of prey on the ground to track and hunt.
 Their night vision is so good that they can see in the dark,
 When a small group of animals, say, a little species,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new species will need different traits or adaptations to become a strong competitor, rather than the ones it previously needed.
 The original population has not changed, and it still needs to adapt to its environment.
 Over time, as new species adapt to their new environment, they start to look less and less like the other species.
 After tens of thousands, or even hundreds of thousands of years, the two populations will look very different, and they will no longer be considered the same species.
 We call this process speciation, the formation of new species, and it is the inevitable outcome of evolution,
 Plants can make oxygen for us to breathe,
 Plants use the sun's energy to make food from water and carbon dioxide.
 We use plants to make our houses, our clothes, and most of the food we eat.
 The Dragon-King was the top predator of his time, and it feared nothing but its own kind.
 Its long lower jaw is lined with over seventy razor-sharp teeth, and its upper jaw has a row of them as well.
 Its tongue is probably forked, although we are not certain about this, and its diet includes sea turtles, large fish, and other Megalodons.
 It would have attacked anything that entered the water, even a huge dinosaur like the Tyrannosaurus.
 Although most of the foods we associate with the Romans are common today, they did have some strange and unusual dishes, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a type of rodent called the dormouse.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sit on chairs while the rich prefer to recline on couches and have a banquet.
 A few centuries later, foods imported from the Americas or from Asia would not appear in the diet of the ancient Romans.
 For example, they had no maize, no tomatoes, no potatoes, and no chicken.
 The Babylonians built a temple to each of their gods, and regarded it as the residence of that particular deity.
 People would offer up sacrifices to the gods, and priests would perform rituals and ceremonies to satisfy the gods' needs.
 Each temple had a courtyard open to the public, and a inner sanctuary that only the priests could enter.
 Some of the towers are in the shape of a pyramid, and are called Golden-Tipped pyramids,
 The top of the dome is a special place of God.
 In the warm, dry climate of the Middle East, houses are not as important.
 The Hebrews lived mostly out of doors.
 Women were in the kitchen, making food, and the shops were open counters facing the street.
 There are no forests in Canaan, so wood is very expensive.
 Greenlanders are few in number, and according to the Icelandic Saga, Eric the Red, who was banished from Iceland for murder, sailed west and discovered the land, which he named Greenland.
 But regardless of whether he had or had not, the eskimos were already living there.
 Although all belong to the Scandinavian,
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence has a treasure map on it.
 And yet, despite the fact that it was written on the back of a piece of paper,
 The back of the Declaration of Independence reads, in reverse,
 Although no one can determine who the author was, this large parchment document, which measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches,
 And so it's likely that this symbol was added as a tag.
 The Normandy landings and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the South remained unliberated.
 It was ruled by the Vichy French, who had made a peace deal with the Nazis in 1940,
 On August 15, the Allies broke through in the South of France, and this became known as the breakout of the Dragon.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French troops had liberated Southern France and turned their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a single culture shared by a group of people who live together and work together.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin word civilis, which means citizen,
 The city is the ancestor of the nation, and civilized culture means that knowledge is passed down from generation to generation, and that the footprints of culture remain,
 Minority cultures often disappear without a trace, and are not considered as a proper civilization.
 During the war, the thirteen states initially organized themselves into a weak central government,
 Congress has no power to levy taxes, and because there is no national executive or judiciary, Congress relies on the state governments to enforce all laws.
 It also has no power to override state laws and state taxes.
 These amendments must be ratified by all the states, and the state delegates are often absent.
 The Italian national football team and the German national football team are the second most successful football teams in the world, winning the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, ice hockey, cycling, roller hockey, and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern part of the country, where Italians compete in international and Olympic games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu.
 Japan is an island nation, and is often referred to as an archipelago.
 Western awareness of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors passed by and named the island Formosa, meaning beautiful.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, and began to change the aboriginal people's food production system, and hired Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugarcane plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty controlled the West and North of Taiwan, and in 1885, the Qing dynasty proclaimed Taiwan as a province.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu is a city of three main structures, the Intihuatana, the Sun Gate, and the Three-Windowed House.
 In order to make it easier for tourists to see the original buildings, the edge of the site has been rebuilt.
 By 1976, however, Machu Picchu's thirty percent had been restored, and the restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common static image photography format is the 35 mm format, which was the dominant film size at the end of the film photography era.
 Today, it's still produced, but more importantly, it's long and wide ratio has been applied to Digital camera image sensor formats.
 The actual size in 35 mm format is 36 mm wide by 24 mm high, which is a bit confusing.
 And so, the aspect ratio of this image is three by two.
 Many common formats, such as the APS format series, are the same or very close to this aspect ratio.
 The often-abused and derided three-quarters rule, when creating a dynamic, is not a bad place to start,
 It stated that the most effective position for the subject was at the intersection of the three lines that divided the image vertically and horizontally into three parts.
 In the course of European history, the already rich and powerful Catholic Church was closely monitored.
 Despite the fact that European languages and customs vary,
 From the King to the peasant, it permeates the power of every individual.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's money funds are set up specifically to do just that.
 The centralized power of the church in Rome lasted for over a thousand years,
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain began to enforce a naval blockade of Germany.
 They cut off the lifeline of military and civilian supplies, a strategy that proved effective, although it violated international law,
 Britain laid mines in international waters to prevent any ship from entering what was effectively a no-go zone.
 Because of the limited response to this strategy, Germany expects its unrestricted U-Boat warfare to have a similar response.
 In the twentieth century, most citizens were pacifist and separatist.
 After witnessing the atrocities of World War I, nations around the world were eager to avoid a repeat.
 In eighteen eighty four, Tesla moved to the United States, where he accepted a job with the Edison Electric Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents, a copy of the Iliad, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former boss, to Thomas Edison.
 Each period of China's history has its own characteristics, and each period of China's history is a distinctive dynasty.
 Similarly, the same is true of dynasties during the transition period,
 In these turbulent times, the various lords fought each other for the throne.
 Three Kingdoms is one of the most bloody periods in Chinese history, with thousands of people dying for the control of the Western Palace.
 There are also many social and political implications, such as the use of measurement units, the shift from autocracy to republic, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 In addition, after the revolution, office openings were open to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and successful men to rise.
 The same is true of the military, because the rank of an officer is no longer based on rank, but on merit.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working-class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was interested in things beyond the world of dust and dirt, and he used to go to a cave called Hira,
 The cave itself, not only endured the trial of time but preserved it, and gave Muhammad's spiritual vision a very vivid form.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain, completely isolated from the outside world.
 In fact, even knowing it's there, it's not easy to find, and once inside the cave, it's completely cut off from the world.
 Except for the clear, beautiful sky and the surrounding mountains,
 The Giza pyramid complex is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands today.
 The great pyramid, built in the third century BC, is one of a number of large pyramids that the Egyptians built to pay tribute to their late pharaohs.
 Giza, the site of the great pyramids, includes several pyramids, several smaller pyramids, several temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was built to commemorate Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to commemorate Khufu's wife and family.
 The symbol for uppercase V is like the letter V, and the symbol for lowercase V is like a pin or a rectangle with a missing bottom edge.
 The top of the bow is called the nock, and the bottom of the bow is called the fletching.
 The upper bow usually makes a softer sound, while the lower bow makes a stronger, more determined sound.
 Please use a pencil and make your own markings, but remember that the notes you print out are going to have musical meaning, so they should be treated with respect.
 On October 6, 1789, the frightened King, Marie-Antoinette, and their two children,
 They rode back to Paris, and a crowd of people surrounded them, shouting and threatening the King and the queen.
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 In front of the terrified queen, a rioter waved the severed head of a Royalist guard who had been killed at the Palace of Versailles.
 The United States of America, in conquering the Philippines,
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial government, which used the money to pay for most of its expenses, and to pay interest on bonds issued in the Philippines' name.
 Of course, the high profits gained by the U S. imperialists are based on the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people.
 In order to understand the Templars, we must first understand the background that led to the formation of the Templar order.
 The period of time covered by the story is commonly referred to as the Middle Ages,
 And the earlier the Middle Ages, the less active the Middle Ages.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses many different ideas, including Technological determinism, Technological inevitability, and a strict definition of Technological determinism, whereby human destiny is driven by the underlying logic of scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most explanations of technological determinism include both of these general ideas: one is that technological development itself, to a very large extent, transcends cultural or political influence,
 For example, someone might say that cars will inevitably lead to the development of roads.
 But to build a national road network for only a few cars, that's not economically viable, so a new production method was needed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The high number of cars on the road also leads to a higher rate of road traffic accidents, which in turn will drive the invention of new medical technologies to repair the injuries.
 Romanticism had a strong cultural determinism coloring its themes. This came from the works of Goethe, Schiller, and Schlegel.
 In the romantic setting, geography shapes the individual, and as time goes by, geography-related customs and cultures emerge, which are much more compatible with the locality than any arbitrary law.
 And Paris, like Constantinople, was the fashionable resort of the European nobility.
 Its reputation as a center for luxury goods began around the year 400 and lasted until around the year 1100.
 Its status declined in the twelfth century, mainly because of the return of the Crusaders, who brought back silks and spices from the Orient.
 At the same time, Constantinople became the fashion capital of the world.
 GOTHIC style peaked in the 10th to 11th centuries,
 Initially, the skirt was influenced by Byzantine culture.
 However, because of cultural lag, Western fashion may be 25 to 30 years behind.
 As the Middle Ages drew to a close, Western Europeans developed their own styles.
 Self-sufficiency farming is the practice of farming only enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 And self-sufficiency is a simple and often organic system that uses local seeds stored within the ecological zone,
 Historically, most peasants have been self-sufficient in their agricultural production.
 A subculture allows like-minded people to band together,
 Given the age, race, class, and positional differences among members, a subculture may be characterized by a variety of differences.
 Let's make the Asian-American identity something that is a combination of many different things,
 Members of a subculture often symbolically use unique styles of dress, behavior, and slang to indicate their membership.
 One of the most common ways of explaining the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse,
 Some of these children are called wild children, meaning wild or abandoned.
 The abandoned child may have experienced severe childhood abuse or trauma.
 Some are said to have been raised by animals, and some are said to have lived alone in the wild.
 If a Wolf-Child were to be raised entirely by Non-Human animals,
 Although project-based learning should make learning easier and more fun, the framework approach takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a method of teaching, it is a way of supporting people who are just learning to use a new computer program or start a new project.
 Supporting the teacher is a form of support that can be done Online or Offline,
 Virtual support is embedded in the software to question, prompt, and explain those things that may be difficult for the student to handle on their own.
 Sometimes children are put up for adoption because of neglect, abuse, or even because of being a burden.
 No child should grow up in an environment where there is no nurturing, no love, and no education.
 We believe the foster care system is a safe haven for these kids.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 The foster care system should provide all the necessities that a child's original family would have provided.
 The Internet combines elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The Internet's salient feature is that it adds an extra dimension to the uses and the ways in which it is used.
 For example, learning and social interaction are seen as important motivations for using the Internet.
 In studying the audience's response to a Website, Eim and McDowell (1998) also identified personal involvement and continuing relationship as new motivating factors.
 The use of Video allowed for the first time to make sense of Micro-Expressions,
 And the first thing that he did was to try and read the micro expressions on her face.
 Oliver Sacks, in his essay, the President's speech,
 He even suggested that this ability to understand human behaviour may be a common trait shared by dogs and other animals.
 Research in the twentieth century showed that there are two kinds of mutation,
 Mutation adds new genetic variation, while selection removes the ones that don't work.
 And because of separation and reorganization, variation comes and goes between the two libraries.
 On the other hand, in the tropical grasslands, the primates have a digestive system like ours, and the available plant resources are not enough to satisfy their needs.
 In addition, if this is not done, there will be serious consequences, including growth inhibition, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest plant-based resources to obtain are the leaves and proteins found in legumes, but even as primates, we humans have a difficult time digesting these proteins unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods like ants, termites, and eggs not only are easy to digest,
 In summary, if our ancestors solved the protein problem in a way that's no different to how chimpanzees and gorillas use it today,
 A disruption in sleep is when you wake up intentionally during normal sleep and then fall back to sleep within a short time,
 This is easy to do, using a relatively quiet alarm clock, so that you wake up without being completely roused.
 If you find yourself resetting the alarm clock while you're asleep, you can put the alarm clock on the other side of the room to force yourself out of bed.
 Other choices based on the biological clock include drinking large amounts of liquid, especially water or tea, before bed,
 The way to be calm is to be in a state of complete relaxation.
 The lesser the pressure, the more alive and the more likely it is that each person will find absolute peace and satisfaction.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment, and the only thing that prevents us from doing so is our own tension and negative emotions.
 Tibetan Buddhism, while based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is a very simple thing it includes Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the way of universal love.
 In Kundalini yoga, Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualization.
 The core practice of Tibetan meditation is called Tummo,
 Germany was the common enemy of all the Allied powers, and this facilitated cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States.
 Two years after the war ended, former allies became enemies, and the cold war began.
 This war lasted for forty years, and the proxy armies fought it out on many different battlefields, including Afghanistan and Cuba.
 By September 17, 1939, the Polish front had been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize the Army.
 However, these plans were almost immediately abandoned, after the USSR violated the Latvian peace treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties,
 Shipping has been the most effective way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 In the traditional sense, the Navy's job is to ensure that the nation maintains its ability to transport personnel and goods, while at the same time, disrupting the enemy's ability to transport personnel and goods.
 One of the most noteworthy examples of this is the North Atlantic war during World War II, when the United States tried to transport people and goods across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, with its U-Boat fleet, tried to intercept the transport.
 Had the allies failed, Germany would have been able to conquer Britain.
 Goats were first tamed around one hundred thousand years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Civilizations and tribes began to domesticate them, eat and use their milk, meat, wool, and skin.
 The family usually keep their sheep in a flock, and they are usually cared for by a shepherd, or shepherdess.
 England had built a freight road in the sixteenth century.
 Although the Malay railroad cars were just made of parallel wooden planks,
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force present. Every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 This became a common practice, but the iron plates would cause the wooden wheels to wear out more quickly.
 Eventually, the wood wheel was replaced by the iron wheel, and in 1767, the first all-iron track was built.
 The first known form of transportation was walking.
 Their ancestors, the Southern apes, did not have the upright walking habit.
 People have found bipedalism in South Asian ape fossils dating from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life, join the environmental movement, and even become an environmental activist,
 In many cases, this is akin to a symptomatic treatment,
 It is obvious that, with the advancement of science and technology, the world has changed a great deal, and that the problem of overpopulation and the wasteful lifestyle of human beings has become even more serious.
 The handwritten draft, signed by Speaker John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was approved on July 4 and sent to the printer John Dunlap's printing shop,
 Printed in the night, and distributed by the morning,
 On July 8, John Nixon read the document aloud for the first time in the White House's Rose Garden.
 The letter, dated July 6, was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9.
 The remaining 25 Dunlap broadsides are the earliest known versions of the document.
 Many paleontologists believe that there was a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still with us today,
 Many people think they are not dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But the birds still have a lot in common with dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, they lay eggs, and they walk on their two hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus.
 Today, almost all computers that are used process information based on Binary codes.
 Binary numbers can only take on two values, zero or one, and are referred to as Binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not show up immediately, and vomiting is a common symptom, so it's not easy to make a diagnosis.
 The most powerful indication of a poisoning may be a container that was opened at the scene and contains a drug or household toxic chemical.
 Check the label on the poison for specific first aid instructions.
 Entomologists use the term bug to formally refer to this group of insects.
 The term is derived from the familiarity of humans with the Botfly, a parasitic insect that is well adapted to living in humans.
 The wasp and the maggot are both nesting insects,
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis,
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerves.
 Research has found that women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis.
 A couple may decide not to have children for their own or their children's benefit.
 These couples may be planning to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents terminate their right to be parents, and so another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to find out how the world works, and in practice, this methodology guides most scientific research.
 An experiment is a trial used to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses, although experiments are not the only method of scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers were interested in the classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on all areas of science, including psychology, were adopted.
 With the decline of Greek knowledge, Western Europe became detached from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Researchers have observed many physiological and behavioral rhythms that are largely determined by the biological clock and its presence.
 Periodic rhythms are not just a simple response to an external periodic signal,
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that keeps time even without an external cue.
 Hershey and Chase's experiment, which showed DNA to be the main constituent of heredity,
 Her and Cao's work has led to the development of a vaccine that uses bacteria or viruses to carry their own DNA into the bacteria.
 They did two experiments, one using radioactive phosphorus to tag the bacteria's DNA, and the other using radioactive sulphur to tag the bacteria's protein.
 Mutations can have a variety of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected genetic material, and whether the affected cell is a reproductive or a non-reproductive cell.
 Only the reproductive cells' mutations are passed on to the child, and other cell mutations lead to cell death or cancer.
 Natural scenery attracts those who are interested in natural areas,
 Activities include hunting, fishing, photography, birding, park tours and ecological system studies.
 For example, visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small town to go to work, and the places they pass on their way to work are the same places where they work.
 In this dynamic traffic weave, everyone is connected to and supports the private car-based transportation system in some way.
 Today, science shows that this massive carbon economy is no longer sustainable.
 Everyone is a member of society and uses the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints of this magnitude.
 Why does the transportation system cause so many complaints? Why does it break down every day?
 Traffic flow studies look at the movement of drivers and vehicles between two points, and how they interact.
 Unfortunately, research on traffic flows is difficult because it is impossible to predict the behaviour of the driver one hundred percent.
 The driver's behaviour is often within a reasonable consistency range,
 In order to better represent traffic flow, we've established relationships between three main characteristics: (1) the volume,
 These relationships help with roadway planning, design, and operation.
 Insects are the earliest animals to have flown in the air,
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings backward.
 This gave them more small surface area to hide in.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings backward are dragonflies and damselflies.
 A few thousand years ago, a man called Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people think he is right, but many others disagree and think the sun and other stars revolve around the earth.
 It seems reasonable, because the earth doesn't feel like it's moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the largest river in the world, with a volume of water that is more than eight times the volume of the next largest river.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river on earth, with some of its tributaries being as wide as six miles.
 The Amazon River accounts for 20% of all the world's river flow.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the great size and sophisticated construction techniques of the Giza pyramids have never been surpassed.
 The new Kingdom Egyptians marveled at the monuments of their predecessors, which were over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city state has a population of about 800 people, and it is the world's smallest independent nation, as well as the world's smallest country.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its laws, regulations, and official communications.
 Italian is also the most commonly spoken language in the country, with about eighty percent of the population using it daily.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about gold, silver, copper, and other basic chemical elements since ancient times, because these elements can be found in nature in their natural forms, and are relatively easy to use with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle proposed a theory that everything is made up of one or more of the four elements, namely earth, water, air, and fire.
 This is more like the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas and plasma, although he also proposed a theory that they would change into new substances,
 Alloys are basically made up of two or more metals.
 Calcium, potassium, and so on, are all metals,
 There are also alloys that contain a small amount of non-metal elements, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that the period at the end of this sentence could contain billions of atoms.
 And so the pencil became a favorite of many.
 Unfortunately, as new writing styles emerged, the pencil's status and usage declined.
 People now write information on a computer screen, and they never have to touch a pen, ink, or paper.
 People can only guess what the outcome will be when the new keyboard is released.
 The principle of fission is as follows: You need energy to bring a nucleus and a lot of protons and neutrons together.
 He'd be pushing a big, heavy, and cumbersome little atomic nucleus,
 Some atoms contain unstable nuclear particles, which means that they are likely to split apart in the absence of any stimulus.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rock and dust, and the moon's outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about seventy kilometers thick near the center and about one hundred kilometers thick at the far side.
 The darker side of the moon is thinner, and the light side is thicker.
 Because the crust is thinner, the nearby side may have more of the darker,
 The core of the content theory is to find out what makes people feel good or interested.
 These theories suggest that as people mature and enter adulthood, certain needs and or desires are internalized.
 These theories research why some people want to do the things they do, and what the environment is like that makes them want to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, when managers start leading former colleagues, there are two kinds of behavior.
 This type of manager is very difficult to make unpopular decisions, and has difficulty in implementing discipline, performance evaluation, and accountability.
 In another extreme case, this person will become a totally different individual,
 And the leader of the team is ultimately responsible for the team's success or failure.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between the leader and other team members.
 Virtual teams need to maintain the same quality standards as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as the point of contact for the corresponding in-person team.
 They tend to have more autonomy than traditional team members, because their team may schedule meetings across different time zones, which the local management may not understand.
 The real invisible team, the one that Larson and LaFasto call a virtual team,
 The invisible team is a management team that every member reports to.
 Why would a company spend so much time building a learning organization? One of the goals of building a learning organization is to innovate.
 When all the available resources are being effectively utilized among the functional departments of an organization, creativity and innovation will occur.
 Therefore, an organization in the process of overcoming a common obstacle,
 Before an organization can innovate, the leader must create a culture of innovation, sharing knowledge and learning.
 Angel, in 2006, explained the continuous body approach as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for the theoretical approach of cognitive research.
 The brain and the mind are related, and the brain's role in behavior can be supported by the brain's anatomy.
 We've known for a long time that different types of brain injury, trauma, injury, and tumors can affect behavior.
 The rise of new technologies has enabled us to see and study the structure and workings of the brain in ways that were never before possible.
 This has provided us with a wealth of information and materials to help us understand how the brain works.
 Artificial intelligence has a very strong science fiction color, but it's actually a very important branch of computer science that studies the behavior, the learning, and the intelligence of machines.
 Research into artificial intelligence involves making machines that can perform tasks that require intelligence.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and customer issues,
 All of these became independent disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial intelligence systems are now commonly used in economics, medicine, engineering and the military, and some home computers and electronic games software applications have built-in artificial intelligence systems.
 Field trips are an important part of any teaching activity, and teachers are usually very willing to take students to places that are not accessible by public transport.
 Virtual field trips are a high-tech solution, allowing students to view museum artifacts, visit a zoo, or view a beautiful piece of art.
 To share the virtual field trip, and also to review the field trip and share with the next class.
 For example, Bennet school in North Carolina, every year, the students will design a Website about their state capital.
 Blogging also helps students improve their writing skills, although students often begin by using grammar and spelling incorrectly.
 Students are often the most critical readers, so Bloggers begin to work hard at improving their writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also “forces students to be more observant of the world around them.
 Blogging can also encourage collaboration, and it can encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 Blogging can make students better at analysis and critical thinking.
 Ottawa is the capital of Canada, and it is a vibrant, bilingual city with a number of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and present.
 Further south is Niagara falls, and to the North is Muskoka, a river and the untouched natural beauty beyond.
 And it's not just Ontario, but the whole of Canada,
 Further to the North, the land becomes more sparsely populated, and in some areas, it is virtually uninhabited.
 One set of surprising population data contrasts the number of African-Americans living in the United States with the number of Canadian citizens living in Canada.
 The East African Islands are located off the East Coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is the largest island in the world, and it's still a big chunk of land for wildlife.
 The smaller Islands are mostly independent, or belong to France, and are known for their luxury beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the Islands, and the religion is widely practiced in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 It is bordered to the North by the Sahara, to the South by the Sahel, and to the West by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: Suggest that all female visitors state they are married regardless of their actual marital status.
 Wearing a ring on your left hand also helps.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to what they perceive as harassment, and that being followed, grabbed, and so on, is not uncommon.
 When you reject a man, be firm, and don't be afraid to stick to your own position, regardless of culture.
 Modern day Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the tenth century, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merenid.
 The Portuguese destroyed the city and rebuilt it, naming it Casa Branca, which it was until the earthquake of 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, and Spanish traders established a trading post there, which they named Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring shopping destinations in all of Morocco.
 Near the old Medina, shops selling Moroccan traditional goods, such as tagine, pottery, leather goods, and water pipes, are common.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, located on the eastern edge of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the Nyiragongo volcano.
 Although Goma is considered safe, it is advisable to check before travelling to any part of North Kivu province.
 This city is also the base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo and the cheapest mountain gorilla tracking project in Africa.
 You can take a boda-boda, a motorbike taxi, to Goma.
 And because it's in a remote area, Tibet is used to describe a place that's far away and remote.
 Today, although Tingri's fame has made it a tourist destination, and it has a small airport,
 In 1990, it was listed as endangered due to the threat of the desert.
 This is Henry Louis Gates on the American public Broadcasting service's special, the African-American world's a miracle.
 The city is a stark contrast to the rest of the country, which is more Arabic in style than it is African.
 Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the northeast and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 square kilometers, divided into 14 different ecological zones, supporting a wide variety of wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's main tourist attractions, and is considered to be the flagship of the South African National Parks system.
 Like all South African national parks, it charges an entrance fee and a conservation levy every day.
 A Wild Card also has its advantages. With this card, you can enter some of the country's national parks, or all of them.
 Hong Kong Island is the most well-known and most visited part of Hong Kong.
 The many buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline are like a flashing bar graph,
 If you want to see the best view of Hong Kong, you can leave the island and go to the opposite side of Kowloon Bay.
 Most of the urban development on Hong Kong Island is concentrated on the reclaimed land in the northern part of the Island.
 This is a British colonial site, so if you're looking for evidence of colonial history, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove forest, stretching 80 kilometres from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been designated as a Biosphere Reserve by UNESCO.
 These forests, however, are not just mangrove swamps, but also contain the remnants of some of the world's largest ever forests.
 The city of Tuen Mun covers an area of 38.5 square kilometres, of which about one-third is water.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary, home to an estimated 400 Royal Bengal tigers and about 30,000 deer.
 There are buses all day long from the city to the river crossing, but most of them, especially those going to the East and to Jakaal, Bumthang,
 In view of the fact that the interval buses are often full,
 In most areas, you can get comfortable, solid Japanese Coaster buses.
 To get to nearby locations, such as Palo and Puna, a shared taxi is a quick and comfortable way to go.
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River, connecting the Brazilian city of Oiapoque with French Guiana's Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock.
 Two towers are 83 meters high, the length of the bridge is 378 meters, and there are two 3.50 meter wide car lanes.
 The bridge is 15 meters clear of the water, and it opened to traffic in March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017, at which time the Brazilian customs inspection station is also expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní people are the most important indigenous group living in the present-day region of Eastern Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was home to the Guaycuru and Payagua, among other indigenous tribes.
 In the sixteenth century, Paraguay was known as the Indian province,
 For three centuries, the Spanish ruled the Philippines.
 Since Asuncion was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been trying to preserve many of the city's native characteristics and features.
 Argentina is known for having the world's top polo teams and players.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in Las Cañitas,
 In other words, the race is run on a smaller scale.
 For news of the tournament and how to purchase tickets for the Argentine horse racing Association.
 The Falkland Islands pound is the official currency of the Falkland Islands, and is pegged to the British pound sterling at a one-to-one ratio.
 You can exchange your money at the only bank on the island, which is located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West shop.
 The pound is generally used everywhere on the island, and Stanley is also often a place where you can use a credit card and pay in U S . dollars.
 In the outer Islands, credit cards may not be accepted, but U S . and British currencies are.
 It is almost impossible to change the Falkland Islands currency before leaving the Islands.
 Montevideo is located just south of the Tropic of Capricorn, so it is summer in the Southern Hemisphere's winter.
 Mont de Vesuvius is located in the subtropical region, and in the summer months, the temperature often exceeds 30°C.
 Winters can be colder than it seems, with temperatures rarely falling below zero, but when wind and humidity combine, it can feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There is no specific rainy and dry season here, as the amount of rainfall is roughly the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing humans, wild animals are still wild animals, and we should not feed or disturb them.
 The park's management staff say that bears and wolves need to be at least 100 yards apart,
 No matter how docile the animal, a bear, for example,
 Each year, dozens of tourists are injured by not keeping a proper distance.
 In addition, bears and other wildlife are attracted to the scent, so avoid carrying or cooking foods that give off a scent, and keep the camping area clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, a small country in the South Pacific.
 Apia, the capital of Samoa, has been the country's capital since 1959.
 The Gulf had been the scene of a notorious naval confrontation in 1889, when seven warships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the Gulf.
 Apart from a British cruiser, the rest of the ships sank, and nearly two hundred Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the struggle for independence, organized by Tupua Tamasese,
 Auckland straddles two harbours, and so has a number of beaches, the most popular of which are in the three main areas.
 North of the city, the North Shore beaches extend from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 This is almost all beach, and the water is very safe, with most of it sheltered by New Zealand's Christmas trees.
 Tamaki drive is a beach located in Waitemata Harbour, just off Mission Bay and St Heliers, a high-end suburb of central Auckland.
 These beaches are sometimes crowded with holidaying families, and there are shops and restaurants lining the shore.
 The main beer is number one beer, which is not very complex, but very good to drink.
 You can buy a lot of French wines here, but New Zealand and Australian wines are probably a little bit more durable.
 The local tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you're still worried, you can also buy bottled water very easily.
 For Australians, the concept of a flat white coffee is still a little bit foreign.
 The hot chocolate is a bit on the expensive side, but the quality is good.
 All year round, there are many people who visit the great barrier Reef and it is rare for anyone to be injured while participating in any of the above activities.
 Despite this, however, it is still important to heed the advice of the relevant authorities and to follow all the signs and warnings.
 Box Jellyfish are found in the waters around 1770 town and occasionally at other times of the year.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, and most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The main habitat of the saltwater crocodile is not the ocean, but the river mouths of the North Queensland town of Rockhampton.
 By booking in advance, travellers can rest assured that they will have a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Although a tour operator may help you book a tent,
 The tour operator will usually provide a package that includes breakfast, airport transfers, and sometimes even a flight and hotel stay.
 If you need time to consider the price, or if you need to get other documents, such as a visa, they can hold the reservation for you.
 If you need to make any changes or have any requests, it's best to go through the travel agent first, rather than dealing directly with the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the majority of attendees choose to camp out, and a large majority of attendees consider this to be a very important part of the festival experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll need to get there early and claim a spot near the front of the stage.
 Remember, though the main stage music may have ended, other parts of the festival may still be playing music into the wee hours of the night.
 Some music festivals have a special camping area for families with small children.
 If you're going to cross the North Sea in winter, check the position of the passenger compartment, because in ice it will be very noisy for those who are most affected.
 The St . Petersburg cruise includes a city tour. Cruise passengers may obtain a visa waiver.
 Casinos are designed to keep customers inside as long as possible.
 They will often provide special food, drinks, and entertainment to keep the customer happy and keep them at the casino.
 Some venues provide free alcoholic beverages, but intoxication can impair a person's judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone who drives in high altitude or crosses a mountain pass should consider the possibility of encountering snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On a frozen road, the friction is very low, and you cannot drive as fast as on a smooth asphalt road.
 In a short time, the snowfall can be so heavy that it will trap you.
 Snow, sleet, and water droplets on the windshield can also block your view.
 On the other hand, snow and ice are common in many countries, and transportation is almost never disrupted.
 Hunting safaris are perhaps the most attractive tourist activity in Africa, and are a highlight for many tourists.
 The word safari is commonly used to refer to a land-based tourist expedition to observe wildlife in their natural habitat.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, are said to like the sound of a car,
 Lions, leopards, and tigers are sometimes afraid of people, and you can see them much better with a good pair of binoculars.
 Hiking, also called bushwalking, backpacking, or trekking, is the activity of walking a long distance, primarily on foot.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to have hosted two summer Olympics, the first being in 1964.
 If you had booked a 2020 flight and a hotel before the announcement,
 Cancelled policies vary, but as of the end of March, most of the cancellations that were put in place because of the new Coronavirus didn't extend beyond July,
 Ticket prices are expected to range from 2,500 to 13 million yen, with the average price around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them to dry. Even if the room does not have an iron and ironing board, many hotels offer to lend them.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing a stiff, starched sock, you can use a blow dryer instead.
 Be careful not to make the clothes too hot, which can cause them to shrink and burn.
 There are many ways to purify water, and some are more effective at dealing with specific contaminants.
 In some areas, it takes only one minute to boil, while in other areas it takes several minutes.
 Filtering water can vary in effectiveness, so if you're concerned about this, then you should consider buying sealed bottled water from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter a dangerous animal that they do not commonly see at home.
 Pests can destroy food, cause allergic reactions, and spread toxins or diseases.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or those that can transmit violence to humans, are not usually considered pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the opportunity to purchase duty-free goods at designated locations.
 Travellers going to countries that levy a heavy tax on alcohol, tobacco and other goods,
 The most challenging section of the Pennsylvania Turnpike is the section between Point Marion and Fairmont.
 If you're not used to driving on rural roads, then you'll want to keep your wits about you.
 The speed limit signs on the road were much lower than the previous and subsequent sections, and the importance of strictly adhering to the speed limit was emphasized.
 Oddly, though, the cell phone service here is much better than on many other routes, such as the Pennsylvania prairie.
 German pastries are great, but Bavarian pastries are even more delicious and varied, similar to their neighboring Austrian pastries.
 Fruit is a common ingredient in desserts, and apples are used year-round for making desserts.
 Many German baked goods also feature almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts.
 If you'd like to try a bit of the more intense flavor, you could try a fruit jelly,
 Curry is a dish of meat or vegetables cooked in a spicy sauce.
 The curry dish can be either dry or wet, depending on how much water is added.
 In the North of India and in the interior of Pakistan, curry is often made with sour milk,
 Indonesia has 17,000 Islands, so Indonesian food is just a catch-all term that encompasses all kinds of regional cuisines.
 But if there are no more adjectives, it's usually referring to food that comes from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now everywhere in the Islands you can eat Javanese food, and there are many simple dishes with the main ingredients being peanuts, chili, sugar and various spices.
 The spur is a metal piece that hangs from the saddle and is used to support the rider's weight.
 They provided better stability for the rider, but also had safety concerns, as the rider's foot could get caught.
 If a rider is thrown from the horse, but one foot is caught in the stirrup, the horse may drag him as it runs.
 First, most of the people who ride horses wear spurred boots, and the soles of their boots are very, very narrow.
 Second, some saddles, especially English-Style saddles, have a safety strap that will release if the rider falls backward.
 Chile's top hiking destination is Cochamó Valley, which has been called the Yosemite of South America, with its range of granite cliffs and rock formations.
 From the summit, the view is awe-inspiring, and from here, climbers from all over the world have been opening up new routes.
 Skiing and snowboarding are very popular sports where the skier or snowboarder attaches skis or a snowboard to their feet and then glides down a snowy landscape.
 Skiing is the main tourist activity for many ski enthusiasts, who are sometimes called snow bunnies.
 The idea of skiing goes back a long way, with cave paintings of skiers dating back to around 5000 BC.
 As a sport, high-altitude skiing can be traced at least as far back as the seventeenth century, when Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Skiing is also known as backcountry skiing,
 This event is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually does not involve these two activities.
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 When the conditions are right, you can go further on a bike than you can on foot, but only in a very small number of cases.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small size, but with many independent countries.
 But in this case, the Schengen area is a bit like a country.
 As long as you are in the region, you can usually just go through the border without having to go through a passport checkpoint again.
 And the same goes for Schengen visas, where you don't have to apply for a visa in every Schengen country.
 There is no uniform definition of what constitutes an antique, and some tax agencies define an antique as anything over 100 years old.
 This definition varies by region, and in North America, for example, the age limit may be shorter than in Europe.
 Crafts may be defined as antiques, although they are much more recent in date than the mass-produced equivalent.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important part of the Sami's culture, and it is important to many people who make their living in other ways.
 Traditionally, however, not all Sami participated in the large-scale reindeer herding industry,
 Today, many Sámi people are involved in the tourism industry,
 Although the term Gypsy is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered to be a form of offensive stereotyping.
 If you're subject to a travel warning, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult with the advice of governments other than your own, but their advice is for their citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different treatment than Europeans or Arabs.
 The travel advisory can only give you a brief summary of the local situation.
 And the advice given here is often more general and less detailed than what is provided elsewhere.
 The term is used to describe any dangerous weather event that causes damage, disruption, and severe social disruption.
 Anywhere in the world, bad weather can happen.
 The storms, the flooding, the excessive rainfall, the lightning, the tornado, the water spout, the hurricane,
 Regional and seasonal severe weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms.
 We strongly recommend that you pay attention to the local severe weather risks, which may affect your travel plans.
 Anyone planning to go to a war zone should be professionally trained.
 So if you search for a course on how to deal with hostile environments,
 This course will typically cover all of the topics discussed here, and will often be in the form of a case study.
 The training usually lasts for 2 to 5 days, and will involve role-playing, first aid, and sometimes armed combat training.
 There are books and magazines about outdoor survival, but there are very few publications about combat survival.
 Travellers who plan to have a gender reassignment surgery abroad must carry valid documentation when they return.
 As for whether or not they'd be willing to issue a passport without specifying gender,
 The degree of recognition of these documents by foreign governments also varies.
 Since the September eleventh attacks, security checkpoints have become even more of a nuisance.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery,
 Offshore currents are the rapid return of ocean waves to the open ocean from a reef, atoll, or similar feature.
 The underwater topography causes the water to flow in a few deep areas, which can create a strong current.
 Most of the deaths were caused by swimming against the current,
 Getting back after the rapids is much easier.
 Strive to move to a place where you won't be trapped again, or wait for rescue, depending on your skills and whether you've been spotted.
 The shock of returning home is much more intense, lasts longer, and can be more damaging.
 For the traveler who adapts easily to new cultures, it can be hard to readapt to their own.
 After living abroad for a while, you will find that you have adapted to the new culture and dropped some of your home culture's habits.
 When you first arrive, people may be very patient and tolerant because they know that travelers need time to adjust.
 People may not realize that travelers need patience and understanding on their return.
 For children, the sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most fun activities in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and before the show starts, you can see them just standing there,
 You can always hear the tourists and the little vendors.
 The backdrop is a lion-headed man, and it is also the narrator of a long story.
 The scene is displayed on the pyramid, and different pyramids are lit up.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819, and several countries claim sovereignty over the Islands, which have the most bases per square kilometer.
 This is the place the British colonisers took as their own and so if you are looking for evidence of the territory's colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 Other Islands include Lewis and Clark Islands, and a still active volcano that was flooded by a tsunami.
 Ellsworth land is located on the southern part of the peninsula, facing the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountain range here joins the highland, and then reforms as the Ellsworth mountain range, which is divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 North of the Andes, or the Sierra Nevada, is the highest mountain range in the Southern Hemisphere, the Cordillera Darwin, with the highest peak being Mount Darwin at 4,892 metres.
 In remote areas where cell phone coverage is spotty, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 In general, satellite phones cannot replace mobile phones, because they can only be used outdoors when the satellite signal is strong.
 The service is commonly used for shipping, including yachts, as well as for remote data and voice needs of explorers.
 Your local phone service provider should be able to provide you with details about connecting to this service.
 For those who are planning how to spend the gap year,
 This is especially popular among high school graduates who can take a year off before going to college.
 In many cases, taking a gap year abroad can actually improve your chances of getting into a top U.S. college.
 In general, these are paid for by the student.
 Finland is a great sailing destination, and it's known as the land of a thousand lakes,
 In the Islands and Lakes, a boat is not necessary.
 Add to that the largest of the Islands, and you've got a place that can accommodate any size of boat, from the largest to the smallest.
 Boating is a Finnish national pastime, and every seventh or eighth person owns a boat.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand also have similar situations, but in other ways they are quite unique.
 Most typical Baltic cruise ships will spend a long time in St Petersburg.
 This means you can have a full day to explore this historic city,
 If you are only going to visit the island by boat, you do not need a separate visa.
 Some cruise lines advertise Berlin as a highlight,
 For people of all ages and backgrounds, flying can be a terrifying experience, especially if they've never been on a plane before or have had a traumatic experience.
 I'm not sure that's true of many people,
 For some people, knowing how an airplane works and how it flies can help them overcome their fear of the unknown or uncontrollable.
 The delivery of goods can be a high-reward, high-risk proposition.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but on other routes and for smaller companies, it's a problem.
 If they use air transportation, it may take several days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The quickest way is to have it carried as checked baggage, and according to the airline's regulations, it is forbidden to carry unchecked baggage, so you have to be there.
 The most obvious way to do this is to spend a lot of money and enjoy the perks.
 However, this is not cheap: According to rough estimates, the price of a business class ticket could be as much as 4 times that of an economy ticket,
 In general, flying from A to B directly, there's no need to look for a discounted business or first-class ticket.
 Airlines know that some core customers are willing to pay a premium for fast, comfortable travel.
 The capital is Chisinau, and the main language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multiethnic Republic, and it has suffered a lot from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of Transnistria, a self-proclaimed Republic with its own government and currency, but without any recognition from the United Nations.
 Despite the political negotiations' failure, the two regions of Moldova were able to rebuild their economic ties.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Eastern Orthodox Church.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey, with a population of around 3.7 million, and it is the second largest port in Turkey, after Istanbul.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, it is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center surrounded by a huge bay and mountains.
 Between the wide avenues, glass-walled buildings, and modern shopping malls, there are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets, and old mosques and churches.
 In Haldarsvik, you can enjoy the view of Eysturoy, the next island.
 In the cemetery, some of the tombs are decorated with interesting marble sculptures of cock.
 A half-hour's stroll through this enchanting village is well worth while.
 To the North it is an easy ride to the romantic and picturesque town of Sintra, which is the famous and much-admired Elysium of Lord Byron.
 Scotturb 403 public bus runs regularly to Sintra, stopping at the Quinta do Monte.
 You can also visit the North to see the famous Sancta Maria, the place where the Virgin Mary appeared.
 Please remember that you are actually visiting a huge mass grave site, which has a huge meaning for a large group of people.
 There are still many men and women who survived here, and they are still alive today,
 Please give this place the dignity, the solemnity, and the respect it deserves.
 And don't mark or graffiti on the buildings,
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with Catalan being spoken by about half of the population, and Spanish being understood by the vast majority.
 However, most of the signs are in Catalan, as this is the first official language, as stated by law.
 Public transportation and other facilities also widely use Spanish.
 The regular broadcasts in the Metro are only in Catalan, but the automatic system uses multiple languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are notoriously self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just a stereotype, the best way to live in Paris is to act as if you have good manners, and to behave like someone who is well brought up.
 If you show a little basic courtesy, the roughness of the Parisians disappears very quickly.
 The forest is dense, mainly with beech, fir and pine trees, and is characterized by a mixture of mountain and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Because of its varied climate, soil, and elevation, the plant life here is very diverse and is known throughout the world.
 The area is also home to a variety of animals and birds.
 Here you can see European Brown bears, wolves, Eagles, Hawks, weasels, foxes, and many more rare and common species.
 Women must wear skirts when visiting the monastery, and the skirt must be at least knee-length.
 Most monasteries will provide a wrap for unprepared women, but if you bring your own, especially if it's a bright color, the monks at the door will give you a wink and a smile.
 As a result, men must also wear long pants, covering the knee.
 You can also borrow from the coat closet, but the clothes are not washed every time someone wears them, so these skirts may feel a little bit uncomfortable.
 The cuisine of Mallorca, like that of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil exclusively.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple summer meal that consists of bread, olive oil, tomatoes, and any other toppings you have on hand, like cheese, anchovies, or even a piece of grilled fish.
 Except for the use of Sie, which is capitalized, all nouns should be capitalized.
 This is one of the main ways to distinguish between some verbs and their objects.
 This also makes it easier to read, although it makes writing a bit more complicated, because you have to judge whether a verb or an adjective is being used as a noun.
 And the Italian language is relatively easy to learn because most of the words are spelled exactly the same as they sound.
 The main letters to pay attention to are C and G, because their pronunciation is based on the vowel change.
 In addition, we need to make sure that we have a different pronunciation for R and Rr . The word caro means dear,
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and has a number of regular rules.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you to master more Persian grammar and to better understand the short sentences.
 There is no doubt that if you speak one Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, a person who understands a little bit of Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese and Spanish are very similar,
 Today, the great pre-modern observatories have been replaced by smaller, more modern ones.
 Because of the light pollution at its peak, the Observatory was usually built in a city or a school.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge, and are located in remote areas with good atmospheric conditions.
 Cherry blossom viewing, also known as Hanami, has been a Japanese custom since the eighth century.
 The concept comes from China, where the peony is a favorite flower.
 In Japan, the earliest Cherry Blossom parties were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the Imperial family at the Imperial Palace.
 Plants are best in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to pick a plant, even if it's just one.
 If you are visiting a carefully tended garden, collecting specimens may also be forbidden, without any room for negotiation.
 Singapore is usually a very safe place, navigation is easy, and once you arrive, you can buy almost anything.
 But because it's located just a few degrees north of the equator, you'll need to deal with both high heat and strong sunlight.
 A few buses also headed North to Hebron, the traditional burial site of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Please confirm that the bus you intend to board will enter Hebron, and not just the nearby Kiryat Arba Jewish settlement.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme for a vacation.
 Visit a castle in the Loire Valley and the Rhine, or take a boat ride on the Danube.
 They also mapped out the routes for popular hiking and biking routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important Christian holidays,
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday are also embraced by non-Christian and worldwide non-Christian populations.
 One of the traditions is to wake up on Easter morning and watch the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has its Christian theological explanation, but it is very likely that it was a pre-Christian celebration of spring,
 More traditional churches often hold Easter Vigil services on the Saturday evening preceding Easter Sunday.
 Initially, animals arrived at these Islands by swimming, flying, or by floating.
 Because of its isolation, mammals were unable to travel the long distances, and the dugong became the main herbivore of the Cocos Islands.
 Humans introduced a lot of mammals to the Galapagos Islands, including sheep, cows, goats, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you go to the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you'll experience the polar night,
 This provided a perfect opportunity to see the northern lights, as the sky would be dark for at least one full day.
 These areas are sparsely populated, and so there's usually no light pollution, and you can see the stars.
 In Japanese work culture, the hierarchy is much more obvious and formal than in Western work cultures.
 The suit is standard business attire, and colleagues use each other's family names or job titles to address each other.
 A harmonious workplace is essential, and emphasis is placed on teamwork, rather than on individual achievement.
 The employee must get the approval of his or her supervisor before making any decision, and must unconditionally obey the supervisor's instructions.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.18891051341886075, 'precisions': [0.5643889936650709, 0.28392739106116843, 0.16746180648619674, 0.103723856486992], 'brevity_penalty': 0.8224529535647406, 'length_ratio': 0.8364952874074674, 'translation_length': 20679, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 45.64752093394598, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.806808898394758, 'scores': [0.7566956281661987, 0.6447785496711731, 0.7423067092895508, 0.7013161778450012, 0.7040431499481201, 0.8020124435424805, 0.9094995260238647, 0.8139638304710388, 0.8542279005050659, 0.8127967715263367, 0.7820098400115967, 0.8613954186439514, 0.8715085983276367, 0.6934691667556763, 0.532210111618042, 0.7410902380943298, 0.7333613038063049, 0.8719916939735413, 0.8790002465248108, 0.8282128572463989, 0.9245758652687073, 0.9090568423271179, 0.8267938494682312, 0.7346387505531311, 0.45905715227127075, 0.8702540397644043, 0.7365788221359253, 0.7417497634887695, 0.8346659541130066, 0.826430082321167, 0.7012571692466736, 0.7011262774467468, 0.8117255568504333, 0.8609875440597534, 0.966933012008667, 0.7290114760398865, 0.8616011142730713, 0.779602587223053, 0.8796002864837646, 0.8281865119934082, 0.8302587866783142, 0.9108591079711914, 0.9102291464805603, 0.9067569971084595, 0.8430063128471375, 0.5070490837097168, 0.7365178465843201, 0.8614726662635803, 0.853794515132904, 0.8896549940109253, 0.8202902674674988, 0.9175302386283875, 0.8856979608535767, 0.8868436813354492, 0.8711450695991516, 0.8685551285743713, 0.6664379239082336, 0.6148077845573425, 0.8880969285964966, 0.9303553700447083, 0.8335896134376526, 0.8819650411605835, 0.8164809942245483, 0.8676644563674927, 0.8595859408378601, 0.8186570405960083, 0.7916566729545593, 0.6731988787651062, 0.7994171977043152, 0.8359367251396179, 0.8617579936981201, 0.6484915614128113, 0.815285861492157, 0.5776773691177368, 0.843291699886322, 0.7670890688896179, 0.804571270942688, 0.8908287286758423, 0.9181183576583862, 0.7782476544380188, 0.8959411382675171, 0.8635133504867554, 0.8224456906318665, 0.6211460828781128, 0.713283360004425, 0.8351349830627441, 0.6020222902297974, 0.8452402949333191, 0.8919499516487122, 0.8331486582756042, 0.7464258074760437, 0.859403133392334, 0.798927366733551, 0.9011142253875732, 0.9106888771057129, 0.9119526743888855, 0.5516820549964905, 0.8220185041427612, 0.4012385308742523, 0.8630265593528748, 0.8682546019554138, 0.7050971388816833, 0.8921564221382141, 0.9002453088760376, 0.8718331456184387, 0.7643874287605286, 0.8480226993560791, 0.8405354619026184, 0.6670610308647156, 0.729200005531311, 0.8643980622291565, 0.9311925768852234, 0.8742620348930359, 0.856593906879425, 0.8689969778060913, 0.8558287024497986, 0.8682268261909485, 0.8799282908439636, 0.9470417499542236, 0.7693279385566711, 0.6685721278190613, 0.7354608178138733, 0.8664842844009399, 0.8912307620048523, 0.811250627040863, 0.8676607012748718, 0.8915772438049316, 0.8879446983337402, 0.8935313820838928, 0.9213815927505493, 0.7441336512565613, 0.647288978099823, 0.8564592003822327, 0.8591341376304626, 0.488531231880188, 0.8647825121879578, 0.8785387277603149, 0.804317057132721, 0.9126205444335938, 0.8449237942695618, 0.9227620959281921, 0.704070508480072, 0.8749486804008484, 0.8983489274978638, 0.6086692214012146, 0.8949770331382751, 0.8310742974281311, 0.8759440779685974, 0.8307026028633118, 0.8804276585578918, 0.9053831696510315, 0.6789498925209045, 0.6385542750358582, 0.8171393275260925, 0.8320558667182922, 0.8202823996543884, 0.864327609539032, 0.870387852191925, 0.8634659051895142, 0.8695284724235535, 0.8339820504188538, 0.5191150903701782, 0.8237565159797668, 0.8891233801841736, 0.8781955242156982, 0.8254861235618591, 0.7818259000778198, 0.8144606351852417, 0.6893576979637146, 0.7590405941009521, 0.8750575184822083, 0.8684284090995789, 0.8546099662780762, 0.7504512667655945, 0.882041871547699, 0.8286576867103577, 0.771998941898346, 0.8547365069389343, 0.5747281312942505, 0.8207184672355652, 0.8548373579978943, 0.36617156863212585, 0.8390381336212158, 0.861649215221405, 0.8915247917175293, 0.886820375919342, 0.950391948223114, 0.33339110016822815, 0.6276969313621521, 0.834290087223053, 0.8800105452537537, 0.6917352080345154, 0.7369404435157776, 0.8154062628746033, 0.6498898267745972, 0.8714807629585266, 0.5125523805618286, 0.5758350491523743, 0.871971070766449, 0.8164785504341125, 0.7210771441459656, 0.5668897032737732, 0.751211941242218, 0.7434336543083191, 0.8626291751861572, 0.8826143741607666, 0.824131429195404, 0.8798828721046448, 0.9167881608009338, 0.8734529614448547, 0.9291268587112427, 0.9068517088890076, 0.8760334849357605, 0.7578166723251343, 0.905281126499176, 0.9139042496681213, 0.9066725373268127, 0.8781895041465759, 0.8703612685203552, 0.8868287205696106, 0.6630550622940063, 0.9095460772514343, 0.8730304837226868, 0.856506884098053, 0.5395853519439697, 0.8099666237831116, 0.8608199954032898, 0.6508085131645203, 0.8667337894439697, 0.7834035158157349, 0.8904864192008972, 0.781101405620575, 0.8118696212768555, 0.8404451012611389, 0.6069390177726746, 0.8057718276977539, 0.8642665147781372, 0.8856800198554993, 0.8872283101081848, 0.8860918283462524, 0.771064817905426, 0.6106826663017273, 0.8263741135597229, 0.8697179555892944, 0.8428080677986145, 0.8329479098320007, 0.7933066487312317, 0.6827498078346252, 0.6467941403388977, 0.9390669465065002, 0.765386164188385, 0.8768215179443359, 0.8987815380096436, 0.9346585869789124, 0.8886964917182922, 0.8736965656280518, 0.7391812205314636, 0.8804851174354553, 0.6500778794288635, 0.47838979959487915, 0.8635519742965698, 0.8310045003890991, 0.739971399307251, 0.8020851612091064, 0.9281352758407593, 0.8427367806434631, 0.8338892459869385, 0.7669839262962341, 0.9076247215270996, 0.6511347889900208, 0.8602564930915833, 0.8592020869255066, 0.8874234557151794, 0.7551341652870178, 0.707527220249176, 0.5594257712364197, 0.7828883528709412, 0.8703488707542419, 0.8592054843902588, 0.9440184235572815, 0.8798883557319641, 0.8641204237937927, 0.8666415810585022, 0.8478586077690125, 0.9178040027618408, 0.9310075044631958, 0.8601542115211487, 0.8479498624801636, 0.7832635045051575, 0.5561686158180237, 0.7773231267929077, 0.8329067826271057, 0.8806768655776978, 0.7417246103286743, 0.7706239223480225, 0.8055281639099121, 0.5747277736663818, 0.8179073929786682, 0.7313790321350098, 0.8587878942489624, 0.9188385605812073, 0.8446781039237976, 0.8682342171669006, 0.8693425059318542, 0.8318100571632385, 0.7683879733085632, 0.7587986588478088, 0.8465160131454468, 0.8752816319465637, 0.8938153386116028, 0.9237033724784851, 0.8815144896507263, 0.871627688407898, 0.6925080418586731, 0.942987859249115, 0.8749971985816956, 0.8859898447990417, 0.8583105206489563, 0.7933712601661682, 0.9225703477859497, 0.542000949382782, 0.4620743691921234, 0.7729235887527466, 0.5330159068107605, 0.8707122206687927, 0.5918012261390686, 0.833745539188385, 0.8506872057914734, 0.9167493581771851, 0.9026288390159607, 0.8937917947769165, 0.8569475412368774, 0.8783673048019409, 0.8674262166023254, 0.9310463070869446, 0.847613513469696, 0.8969026207923889, 0.7802014350891113, 0.8833011388778687, 0.873508632183075, 0.640933096408844, 0.8924036622047424, 0.7397063374519348, 0.8629444241523743, 0.9131182432174683, 0.8167794346809387, 0.8723462224006653, 0.7962772250175476, 0.8396090269088745, 0.795839250087738, 0.8815332055091858, 0.7300125956535339, 0.7603882551193237, 0.8701178431510925, 0.8877204060554504, 0.8876190781593323, 0.8748796582221985, 0.5866848230361938, 0.7623149752616882, 0.8325710892677307, 0.5635007619857788, 0.8216350674629211, 0.9000177383422852, 0.866831362247467, 0.829587996006012, 0.6389661431312561, 0.8079482913017273, 0.6936970353126526, 0.8195397257804871, 0.7812786102294922, 0.7648867964744568, 0.5333622694015503, 0.41689038276672363, 0.8765326142311096, 0.8487105965614319, 0.8868023753166199, 0.9051880240440369, 0.8615353107452393, 0.6442615389823914, 0.6753519773483276, 0.7997673749923706, 0.8001353740692139, 0.6959719657897949, 0.7236839532852173, 0.8302121758460999, 0.8527728915214539, 0.7567883133888245, 0.7906888127326965, 0.7645633816719055, 0.8802030682563782, 0.9015830159187317, 0.9166812300682068, 0.7377064824104309, 0.8024613857269287, 0.8931089639663696, 0.6342330574989319, 0.7497263550758362, 0.9103010892868042, 0.8031315207481384, 0.6873906850814819, 0.4734236001968384, 0.8831892013549805, 0.5795453190803528, 0.6445640921592712, 0.7449467778205872, 0.8131477236747742, 0.8653787970542908, 0.7685248255729675, 0.6553469896316528, 0.8971245288848877, 0.8612382411956787, 0.7393493056297302, 0.7970845103263855, 0.8439531922340393, 0.7871789336204529, 0.8417207598686218, 0.8436295390129089, 0.784274160861969, 0.8857927918434143, 0.9315527081489563, 0.9271036982536316, 0.8426885008811951, 0.8097363114356995, 0.8427264094352722, 0.8724389672279358, 0.8248841762542725, 0.6223108172416687, 0.8595816493034363, 0.8332625031471252, 0.9148002862930298, 0.9022626280784607, 0.7636074423789978, 0.866272509098053, 0.654507577419281, 0.8590858578681946, 0.7114433646202087, 0.840771496295929, 0.8214234709739685, 0.6398246884346008, 0.762229859828949, 0.9082059264183044, 0.7723067998886108, 0.9485247731208801, 0.8056240081787109, 0.8010095953941345, 0.8605155348777771, 0.7433688044548035, 0.8661417365074158, 0.8433913588523865, 0.820767343044281, 0.7829077839851379, 0.5615212321281433, 0.8660264015197754, 0.801912248134613, 0.8590517640113831, 0.8229661583900452, 0.798652708530426, 0.9208002090454102, 0.7462336421012878, 0.7604467868804932, 0.8830193877220154, 0.8495521545410156, 0.6067519783973694, 0.9047616124153137, 0.8649960160255432, 0.7804819941520691, 0.8705162405967712, 0.6957030892372131, 0.6346442699432373, 0.8452160954475403, 0.8379682898521423, 0.5364996790885925, 0.8446753621101379, 0.8464798927307129, 0.8159868121147156, 0.4769706428050995, 0.8276373147964478, 0.8708670735359192, 0.8670687675476074, 0.7508819699287415, 0.4855008125305176, 0.793390691280365, 0.8243494033813477, 0.9011446833610535, 0.8723461627960205, 0.8503634333610535, 0.8724034428596497, 0.7974878549575806, 0.6930592656135559, 0.8664230704307556, 0.804903507232666, 0.751233696937561, 0.8814985752105713, 0.8093461394309998, 0.812312662601471, 0.6504931449890137, 0.834235668182373, 0.7264118790626526, 0.7940220236778259, 0.6643610000610352, 0.8778961896896362, 0.5049344897270203, 0.8830085396766663, 0.8327364325523376, 0.6503896117210388, 0.8018501400947571, 0.8935259580612183, 0.5689205527305603, 0.8539330959320068, 0.8277810215950012, 0.5936971306800842, 0.817814290523529, 0.6882423758506775, 0.8253462314605713, 0.9138988852500916, 0.9354559779167175, 0.7595691084861755, 0.9393730759620667, 0.7886170744895935, 0.8558582663536072, 0.8691725134849548, 0.6172391772270203, 0.5413714051246643, 0.4752809703350067, 0.8944926857948303, 0.7806002497673035, 0.8381732106208801, 0.6647419333457947, 0.7836330533027649, 0.8843976855278015, 0.8449864387512207, 0.7443354725837708, 0.7511120438575745, 0.819679319858551, 0.8645948171615601, 0.8255787491798401, 0.7583066821098328, 0.5948442220687866, 0.7423787713050842, 0.894734263420105, 0.6847717761993408, 0.8820260167121887, 0.8775647282600403, 0.5549185872077942, 0.7392848134040833, 0.9123700857162476, 0.830734372138977, 0.840987503528595, 0.7397351861000061, 0.8675214052200317, 0.841786801815033, 0.9001158475875854, 0.8495427370071411, 0.8734390735626221, 0.8644030094146729, 0.8470913767814636, 0.6452019810676575, 0.8372085094451904, 0.49268385767936707, 0.49065661430358887, 0.8575907945632935, 0.8680243492126465, 0.6076030731201172, 0.7615081071853638, 0.8535144329071045, 0.8378834128379822, 0.6625873446464539, 0.8475765585899353, 0.7976511716842651, 0.6119054555892944, 0.8547227382659912, 0.8778207302093506, 0.6734785437583923, 0.7825788855552673, 0.8684850931167603, 0.8291385769844055, 0.8682230114936829, 0.8286587595939636, 0.8509648442268372, 0.8703517317771912, 0.8274307250976562, 0.90754634141922, 0.9102467894554138, 0.8368644118309021, 0.5450438261032104, 0.6685361266136169, 0.8371191620826721, 0.8650512099266052, 0.7864150404930115, 0.8660763502120972, 0.8991885185241699, 0.9159294962882996, 0.8251268267631531, 0.9119772911071777, 0.9030945301055908, 0.8955559134483337, 0.8098649382591248, 0.6480470299720764, 0.8166477084159851, 0.8139823079109192, 0.7554929852485657, 0.8507772088050842, 0.8761493563652039, 0.8851438164710999, 0.7355632185935974, 0.8839098215103149, 0.824794352054596, 0.7727938294410706, 0.8062333464622498, 0.6865622401237488, 0.790578305721283, 0.7445431351661682, 0.8190203309059143, 0.8746408820152283, 0.8822883367538452, 0.7324861884117126, 0.8664014935493469, 0.9500359892845154, 0.6494362950325012, 0.9017878770828247, 0.7867284417152405, 0.8726664185523987, 0.8983338475227356, 0.8513440489768982, 0.9312103390693665, 0.888182520866394, 0.9110944867134094, 0.7681917548179626, 0.8002592921257019, 0.8794597387313843, 0.8848969340324402, 0.8509672284126282, 0.927333652973175, 0.7942463755607605, 0.974952220916748, 0.8986176252365112, 0.9067296385765076, 0.8709093928337097, 0.8049346208572388, 0.7775672674179077, 0.9095227122306824, 0.9247909188270569, 0.8577889800071716, 0.7722870111465454, 0.8263454437255859, 0.8139156103134155, 0.8284403681755066, 0.8465970158576965, 0.5258148908615112, 0.8619372248649597, 0.9232513904571533, 0.8816788792610168, 0.6740922331809998, 0.5744838118553162, 0.8619396090507507, 0.91957026720047, 0.8939926624298096, 0.8903152942657471, 0.7678913474082947, 0.8271045684814453, 0.6039357781410217, 0.8944255709648132, 0.9148992896080017, 0.8977617621421814, 0.8848479390144348, 0.8940749764442444, 0.6754604578018188, 0.8225826621055603, 0.8676565885543823, 0.9148233532905579, 0.6187304854393005, 0.9031487107276917, 0.7888892889022827, 0.7909447550773621, 0.686385452747345, 0.8147716522216797, 0.8900818824768066, 0.8140586018562317, 0.8867881894111633, 0.9074034094810486, 0.8021849989891052, 0.9288655519485474, 0.8780280947685242, 0.8716077208518982, 0.8466746807098389, 0.7736672759056091, 0.7450354099273682, 0.82133549451828, 0.9034411311149597, 0.7900381684303284, 0.8997469544410706, 0.6819108128547668, 0.9080943465232849, 0.8577821850776672, 0.49613240361213684, 0.8586888909339905, 0.8300948739051819, 0.9266569018363953, 0.7579280734062195, 0.904193103313446, 0.8472315073013306, 0.9352138638496399, 0.8847083449363708, 0.8396165370941162, 0.5764655470848083, 0.8743391036987305, 0.7852141261100769, 0.8857298493385315, 0.8691189885139465, 0.9089105725288391, 0.9104854464530945, 0.7749235033988953, 0.9081592559814453, 0.721346378326416, 0.7954540252685547, 0.8740801215171814, 0.721469521522522, 0.6992288827896118, 0.7513381838798523, 0.8028969168663025, 0.6080909371376038, 0.8750638365745544, 0.8425226807594299, 0.896189272403717, 0.9105529189109802, 0.8938784003257751, 0.7996797561645508, 0.711561381816864, 0.6916683316230774, 0.8626998066902161, 0.8610603213310242, 0.8790156245231628, 0.840373158454895, 0.7541583180427551, 0.7973146438598633, 0.8239690065383911, 0.8963156938552856, 0.7427012920379639, 0.6793051362037659, 0.7782950401306152, 0.8355372548103333, 0.8110474944114685, 0.8666946887969971, 0.8223876357078552, 0.8996537923812866, 0.7148357033729553, 0.7531450986862183, 0.6099058985710144, 0.7661909461021423, 0.8827943205833435, 0.9074330925941467, 0.7946524620056152, 0.576968252658844, 0.7579609155654907, 0.777550220489502, 0.896263062953949, 0.7691181302070618, 0.7616870999336243, 0.8527380228042603, 0.7429203391075134, 0.8615122437477112, 0.9079603552818298, 0.9102593064308167, 0.8906559944152832, 0.7630797028541565, 0.6318919062614441, 0.7741921544075012, 0.8426567316055298, 0.7886638045310974, 0.8572679758071899, 0.8530928492546082, 0.8964727520942688, 0.6026791930198669, 0.898902952671051, 0.8736153244972229, 0.7105328440666199, 0.8447730541229248, 0.8533738851547241, 0.7306625247001648, 0.7982085943222046, 0.8984711766242981, 0.615607500076294, 0.796974778175354, 0.814484715461731, 0.8149400353431702, 0.6949970126152039, 0.9318394064903259, 0.8192273378372192, 0.8832889199256897, 0.6622377038002014, 0.8603559136390686, 0.8514371514320374, 0.8604125380516052, 0.8899666666984558, 0.8492653965950012, 0.8697724342346191, 0.9409329891204834, 0.802758514881134, 0.845469057559967, 0.6673681139945984, 0.8711465001106262, 0.8976989388465881, 0.9109481573104858, 0.8755126595497131, 0.8171300292015076, 0.8173984885215759, 0.8570854067802429, 0.8818578124046326, 0.8521838784217834, 0.6663981676101685, 0.8622226119041443, 0.8093042373657227, 0.7692800164222717, 0.9152453541755676, 0.7562076449394226, 0.7722801566123962, 0.8222660422325134, 0.8794023394584656, 0.8156738877296448, 0.8741510510444641, 0.8934744596481323, 0.8667479157447815, 0.880733072757721, 0.8259725570678711, 0.8911007046699524, 0.8874303698539734, 0.833232581615448, 0.6950665712356567, 0.7610092163085938, 0.7231664061546326, 0.7803252935409546, 0.881394624710083, 0.8304622173309326, 0.7367515563964844, 0.8136312365531921, 0.519173800945282, 0.8342516422271729, 0.8609492778778076, 0.7384670376777649, 0.8642890453338623, 0.8145866990089417, 0.7668030858039856, 0.7802267670631409, 0.8688289523124695, 0.753782331943512, 0.7392194867134094, 0.7342135310173035, 0.85942143201828, 0.7868653535842896, 0.8066255450248718, 0.7007376551628113, 0.9001147150993347, 0.8768702149391174, 0.6750220656394958, 0.6418700814247131, 0.777687132358551, 0.6926928162574768, 0.6287938356399536, 0.7306527495384216, 0.8942072987556458, 0.6965286135673523, 0.8810757994651794, 0.9106428027153015, 0.8709034323692322, 0.8083047270774841, 0.7420302033424377, 0.7741260528564453, 0.8096327781677246, 0.8894370198249817, 0.8955451846122742, 0.9073942303657532, 0.8195643424987793, 0.8138893842697144, 0.8483034372329712, 0.7106417417526245, 0.6534444689750671, 0.9569562673568726, 0.8463287353515625, 0.8775013089179993, 0.6549984812736511, 0.8218325972557068, 0.9021817445755005, 0.8741726279258728, 0.883823573589325, 0.6883185505867004, 0.8159743547439575, 0.8566737174987793, 0.4961452782154083, 0.784997820854187, 0.8067595362663269, 0.763087809085846, 0.6818783283233643, 0.8316543698310852, 0.7720935344696045, 0.8162403702735901, 0.8543746471405029, 0.8310179114341736, 0.8830817341804504, 0.9135934710502625, 0.8521483540534973, 0.602380096912384, 0.7577043771743774, 0.8805303573608398, 0.8501429557800293, 0.5054818391799927, 0.6957099437713623, 0.8300619125366211, 0.7817546725273132, 0.7787424921989441, 0.9360226988792419, 0.8251987099647522, 0.8310970664024353, 0.9336857199668884, 0.7164265513420105, 0.8476995825767517, 0.861906111240387, 0.6756432056427002, 0.762880265712738, 0.7642012238502502, 0.6465403437614441, 0.8675637245178223, 0.7450879216194153, 0.8559569716453552, 0.7076659798622131, 0.8677708506584167, 0.5853979587554932, 0.914360523223877, 0.4326693117618561, 0.8533186912536621, 0.549839198589325, 0.8924470543861389, 0.8609495759010315, 0.7651364207267761, 0.6903080344200134, 0.8339759707450867, 0.8515061140060425, 0.829603374004364, 0.8945878148078918, 0.91921067237854, 0.8840603232383728, 0.891620397567749, 0.9342405200004578, 0.8897803425788879, 0.9211786985397339, 0.7907779812812805, 0.7337833046913147, 0.7595312595367432, 0.86086505651474, 0.7190243601799011, 0.8921279311180115, 0.7448328137397766, 0.8478929400444031, 0.6409751772880554, 0.7735359072685242, 0.6903016567230225, 0.8884517550468445, 0.8980429768562317, 0.8885610699653625, 0.8287169933319092, 0.9283974766731262, 0.8218339681625366, 0.8408972024917603, 0.8512299060821533, 0.8338480591773987, 0.9239819645881653, 0.8178079724311829, 0.8013641238212585, 0.8552568554878235, 0.8542451858520508, 0.758831799030304, 0.9020900130271912, 0.8432630896568298, 0.6741507053375244, 0.8879636526107788, 0.8624879717826843, 0.8511229157447815, 0.8706374168395996, 0.693882167339325, 0.8956634402275085, 0.8517783880233765, 0.8274005055427551, 0.7826704382896423, 0.7830263376235962, 0.6985493302345276, 0.9218018054962158, 0.9243634939193726, 0.8543780446052551, 0.8631297945976257, 0.8116757273674011, 0.7768161296844482, 0.9218779802322388, 0.833725094795227, 0.8887712359428406, 0.881902277469635, 0.9218806624412537, 0.8309398889541626, 0.9032774567604065, 0.8706875443458557, 0.8560845255851746, 0.8256046175956726, 0.8656817078590393, 0.7563706040382385, 0.8914132714271545, 0.7553130984306335, 0.8970154523849487, 0.7790858149528503, 0.7640419006347656, 0.869002103805542, 0.8813000321388245, 0.8844504952430725, 0.8911799788475037, 0.8391666412353516]}